District of Columbia statutes.
35-210

Use of another’s underground line prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any street-railway company operating its system or parts of its system over any portion of the underground electric lines owned and operated by another street-railway company in the City of Washington to continue such operation, or to enter into reciprocal trackage relations with any other company, unless its motive power for the propulsion of its cars shall be the same as that of the company whose tracks are used or to be used. For every violation of §§ 35-210 to 35-212 the company violating it shall be subject to a fine of $10 for every car operated in violation of the provisions of §§ 35-210 to 35-212, said fine to be collected and applied in the same manner as is provided by § 35-211.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1302, ch. 854, § 711
1973 Ed., § 44-210.
1981 Ed., § 44-210.